New York, session 2025-2026, S9520.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "savings accounts for a variable economy (SAVE) for small businesses 3 act". 4 § 2. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 50 to read as 5 follows: 6 § 50. Small business savings accounts. (a) General. (1) The commis- 7 sioner shall establish a program to administer small business savings 8 accounts under this section. 9 (2) The commissioner shall establish minimum standards for small busi- 10 ness savings accounts and shall establish accounts, or enter into agree- 11 ments that meet these standards to administer such accounts. In estab- 12 lishing such standards and making such agreements the commissioner 13 shall, to the extent practicable, seek to minimize fees, minimize risk 14 of loss of principal, and ensure a range of investment risk options 15 available to account beneficiaries. Any eligible small business may 16 establish a small business savings account with respect to such business 17 under terms which meet the requirements of this section. 18 (b) Definition. For the purposes of this section, the term "small 19 business savings account" means a tax preferred savings account which is 20 designated at the time of establishment of the plan as a small business 21 savings account. Such designation shall be made in such manner as the 22 commissioner may by regulation prescribe. 23 (c) Contributions. (1) There shall be allowed as a deduction an amount 24 equal to the contributions to a small business savings account for the 25 taxable year. 26 (2) The aggregate amount of contributions for any taxable year to all 27 small business savings accounts maintained for the benefit of an eligi- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00453-01-5 S. 9520 2 1 ble small business shall not exceed an amount equal to ten percent of 2 the gross profits of the business for the preceding taxable year. 3 (d) Distributions. (1) Any qualified distribution from a small busi- 4 ness savings account shall not be includible in gross income. 5 (2) Any amounts distributed out of a small business savings account 6 that are not qualified distributions shall be included in gross income 7 for the taxable year of the distribution. 8 (3) For purposes of this section: 9 (A) The term "qualified distribution" means any amount: 10 (i) distributed from a small business savings account during a speci- 11 fied period of economic hardship; and 12 (ii) the distribution of which is certified by the taxpayer as part of 13 a plan which provides for the reinvestment of such distribution for the 14 funding of worker hiring or financial stabilization for the purposes of 15 job retention or creation. 16 (B) The term "specified period of economic hardship" means: 17 (i) any one-year period beginning immediately after the end of any two 18 consecutive quarters during which the annual rate of real gross domestic 19 product (as determined by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the Depart- 20 ment of Commerce) decreases, or 21 (ii) any period, in no event shorter than one year, specified by the 22 commissioner for purposes of this section. 23 (C) The commissioner may specify a period under clause (ii) of subpar- 24 agraph (B) of this paragraph with respect to a specified area in the 25 case of an area determined by the governor to warrant assistance from 26 the Federal Government under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and 27 Emergency Assistance Act. 28 (D) The commissioner shall, for each specified period of economic 29 hardship establish a distribution limitation for qualified distributions 30 from eligible small business accounts with respect to such period. The 31 aggregate qualified distributions for any such period from all accounts 32 with respect to an eligible small business shall not exceed such limita- 33 tion. 34 (E) Any distribution not used in the manner certified under subpara- 35 graph (A) of this paragraph shall be treated as a distribution other 36 than a qualified distribution in the taxable year of such distribution. 37 (F) Any amount contributed to a small business savings account (and 38 any earnings attributable thereto), once distributed, shall not be 39 treated as a qualified distribution unless such distribution is made not 40 later than eight years after the date of such contribution. For purposes 41 of this subparagraph, amounts (and the earnings attributable thereto) 42 shall be treated as distributed on a first-in first-out basis. 43 (e) Eligible small business. For purposes of this section: 44 (1) The term "eligible small business" means, with respect to any 45 calendar year, any person if the annual average number of full-time 46 employees employed by such person during the preceding calendar year was 47 twenty-five or fewer and such person has an annual net income of less 48 than two hundred fifty thousand dollars. For purposes of this paragraph, 49 a preceding calendar year may be taken into account only if the person 50 was in existence throughout the year. 51 (2)(A) The term "full-time employee" means, with respect to any year, 52 an employee who is employed on average at least forty hours of service 53 per week. 54 (B) The commissioner shall prescribe such regulations, rules, and 55 guidance as may be necessary to determine the hours of service of an S. 9520 3 1 employee, including rules for the application of this subdivision to 2 employees who are not compensated on an hourly basis. 3 (f) Effect of pledging account as security. If, during any taxable 4 year of the eligible small business for whose benefit an account is 5 established, the account or any portion thereof is pledged as security 6 for a loan, the portion so pledged shall be treated as distributed in a 7 distribution other than a qualified distribution. 8 (g) Annual report. The commissioner shall prepare and deliver an annu- 9 al report on the efficacy of small business savings accounts to the 10 temporary president of the senate and the speaker of the assembly. Such 11 report shall include, but not be limited to, an evaluation as to whether 12 small business savings accounts contribute to financial stabilization of 13 the small business during times of economic hardship, job retention or 14 creation. 15 § 3. Section 209 of the tax law is amended by adding a new subdivision 16 13 to read as follows: 17 13. For any taxable year beginning on or after January first, two 18 thousand twenty-five, any eligible small business, as such term is 19 defined pursuant to section fifty of this chapter, shall be exempt from 20 all taxes imposed pursuant to this article for any contribution to and 21 qualified distribution from a small business savings account established 22 pursuant to section fifty of this chapter, subject to the limits set 23 forth in such section. If a taxpayer files for and receives an exemption 24 from the tax imposed under this section pursuant to the provisions of 25 this subdivision and the funds withdrawn, or any portion thereof, are 26 not expended for a qualifying purpose as set forth in section fifty of 27 this chapter, then the amount of such exemption claimed by the taxpayer 28 shall be added back to tax in the next succeeding taxable year or in the 29 year in which the exemption is disallowed. 30 § 4. Subsection (c) of section 612 of the tax law is amended by adding 31 a new paragraph 48 to read as follows: 32 (48) Any qualified contribution to and any qualified distribution from 33 a small business savings account established pursuant to section fifty 34 of this chapter. If a taxpayer files for and receives an exemption from 35 the tax imposed under this section pursuant to the provisions of this 36 paragraph and are not a qualifying contribution or distribution as set 37 forth in section fifty of this chapter, then the amount of any such 38 exemption claimed by the taxpayer shall be added back to tax in the next 39 succeeding taxable year. 40 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 41 years beginning after such date.